Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.430

Parks, may designate name of.

The board of county commissioners is authorized to designate the name of any park established by the county.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 76 s 3.]

NOTES:

Acquisition of property for park, recreational, viewpoint, greenbelt, conservation, historic, scenic, or view purposes: RCW 36.34.340.